Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.64.070

Limitation.

After the original count, canvass, and certification of results, the votes cast in any single precinct may not be recounted and the results recertified more than twice.

[ 2003 c 111 s 1607. Prior: 2001 c 225 s 9; 1991 c 90 s 3. Formerly RCW 29.64.051.]

NOTES:

Finding, purpose—1991 c 90: "The legislature finds that it is in the public interest to determine the winner of close contests for elective offices as expeditiously and as accurately as possible. It is the purpose of this act to provide procedures which promote the prompt and accurate recounting of votes for elective offices and which provide closure to the recount process." [ 1991 c 90 s 1.]